Washington statutes.
RCW 18.73.101

Variance from requirements.

The secretary may grant a variance from a provision of this chapter and RCW 18.71.200 through 18.71.220 if no detriment to health and safety would result from the variance and compliance is expected to cause reduction or loss of existing emergency medical services. Variances may be granted for a period of no more than one year. A variance may be renewed by the secretary.

[ 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 26; 2000 c 93 s 17; 1987 c 214 s 9.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2010 1st sp.s. c 26; 2010 1st sp.s. c 7: See note following RCW 43.03.027.